Utah statutes.
35A-2-102.   Directors of economic service areas -- Appointment.

(1)  The chief officer of each economic service area shall be a director, who serves as the executive and administrative head of the economic service area.

(2)  A director:

(a)  shall be appointed by the executive director; and

(b)  may be removed from that position at the will of the executive director.

(3)  An economic service director shall be experienced in administration and possess additional qualifications as determined by the executive director, and as provided by law.

(4)  The director shall report on a regular basis to the State Council on Workforce Services on the delivery of services in the economic service area.



Amended by Chapter 188, 2011 General Session

